Wisconsin, session 2025, AB923.
do enact as follows:AB923,11Section 1. 895.439 of the statutes is created to read:AB923,2,92895.439 Sexual extortion; actions for. (1) Any person who suffers 3physical injury to his or her person, emotional distress, or loss of his or her property 4by reason of conduct that is prohibited under s. 942.095 has a civil cause of action 5against the person who caused the physical injury, emotional distress, or loss. An 6action under this subsection may be brought by the person who suffered the 7physical injury, emotional distress, or loss, by the person’s parent or legal guardian 8if the person is a child, or by the personal representative of the person’s estate if the 9person is deceased.AB923,2,1510(2) The personal representative of the estate of a deceased person whose 11death results from suicide, or the person to whom the amount recovered belongs, 12may bring an action for wrongful death against any person who engaged in conduct 13that is prohibited under s. 942.095 if the prohibited conduct was a substantial 14causal factor in the suicide of the deceased person. In an action under this 15subsection, the damage limitations under s. 895.04 do not apply.AB923,3,216(3) (a) Notwithstanding ss. 801.09 (1), 801.095, 802.04 (1), and 815.05 (1g) (a), 17in an action brought under this section, the plaintiff may substitute his or her 18initials, or fictitious initials, and his or her age and county of residence for his or her 19name and address on the summons and complaint. The plaintiff’s attorney shall 20supply the court the name and other necessary identifying information of the 21plaintiff. The court shall maintain the name and other identifying information, 1and supply the information to other parties to the action, in a manner that 2reasonably protects the information from being disclosed to the public.AB923,3,53(b) Upon motion by the plaintiff, and for good cause shown, or upon its own 4motion, the court may make any order that justice requires to protect any of the 5following:AB923,3,861. A plaintiff who is using initials in an action under this section from 7annoyance, embarrassment, oppression, or undue burden that would arise if any 8information identifying the plaintiff were made public.AB923,3,1092. A plaintiff in an action under this section from unreasonably long, 10repetitive, or burdensome physical or mental examinations.AB923,3,12113. The confidentiality of information that under law is confidential, until the 12information is provided in open court in an action under this section.AB923,3,1613(4) If the plaintiff prevails in a civil action under sub. (1) or (2), he or she may 14recover special and general damages, including damages for emotional distress; 15punitive damages; and costs, including all reasonable attorney fees and other costs 16of the investigation and litigation that were reasonably incurred.AB923,3,1917(5) A person may bring a civil action under sub. (1) or (2) regardless of 18whether there has been a criminal action related to the conduct that is prohibited 19under s. 942.095 and regardless of the outcome of any such criminal action.AB923,3,2020